Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-527
Bonds; issuance; election required; exceptions.

Bonds of the city shall not be issued without a vote of the electors in the manner provided for in this act except the following which may be issued by the city council without such vote: (1) To finance street improvements, grading, renewal or refunding; (2) police station, not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars in any one year; (3) park, not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars in any one year; (4) sewer, not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars in any one year; (5) public comfort station, not to exceed fifty thousand dollars in any one year; (6) fire engine house, not to exceed thirty thousand dollars in any one year; and (7) to pay for the acquisition of existing utility systems or plants by condemnation proceedings.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 22, p. 478;

C.S.1922, § 3648;

C.S.1929, § 14-525;

R.S.1943, § 14-527.

"This act", defined, see section 14-101.